third_party/liblouis/src/tables/pt-pt-g2.ctb
endword nicos 4-1345-234
word não 1345
word nossa 1345-234-1
word nossas 1345-234-146
word nosso 1345-234
word nossos 1345-234-234
word nova 1345-1236-1
word novas 1345-1236-146
word novo 1345-1236
word novos 1345-1236-234
word numa 1345-134
word numas 1345-134-234
word nunca 1345-14
word objecta 135-245-2345-1
word objectas 135-245-2345-146
word objectiva 135-245-2345-1236-1
word objectivas 135-245-2345-1236-146
word objectivo 135-245-2345-1236
word objectivos 135-245-2345-1236-234
word objecto 135-245-2345
word objectos 135-245-2345-234
word observações 135-12-1236-12346-234
word observação 135-12-1236-12346
word onde 135-15
word opiniões 135-1234-234
word opinião 135-1234
endword or 56
midword orb 56-12
midword orc 56-14
midword ord 56-145
word ordem 135-145
word ordens 135-145-234
midword orf 56-124
midword org 56-1245
endword orica 135-5-1235
endword oricamente 135-5-1235-56-134
endword oricas 135-5-1235-234
endword orico 135-4-1235
endword oricos 135-4-1235-234
midword orj 56-245
midword orl 56-123
midword orm 56-134
endword ormenta 56-5-134
endword ormentas 56-5-134-234
endword ormento 56-4-134
endword ormentos 56-4-134-234
midword orn 56-1345
midword orp 56-1234
midword orqu 56-12345
midword orr 56-1235
midword ors 56-234
midword ort 56-2345
begmidword orv 56-1236
midword orz 56-1356
begmidword orç 56-12346
word os 13456
endword os 13456
begmidword osc 13456-14
midword osf 13456-124
begmidword osg 13456-1245
begmidword osl 13456-123
begmidword osm 13456-134
midword osn 13456-1345
midword osp 13456-1234
midword osqu 13456-12345
begmidword oss 13456-234
begmidword ost 13456-2345
endword ostica 13456-5-2345
endword osticamente 13456-5-2345-56-134
endword osticas 13456-5-2345-234
endword ostico 13456-4-2345
endword osticos 13456-4-2345-234
begmidword ostr 13456-356
begmidword osv 13456-1236
always ou 1256
word outra 1256-1
word outras 1256-146
word outro 1256-135
word outros 1256-13456
word palavra 1234-1
word palavras 1234-146
word papel 1234-1234
word papéis 1234-1234-234
word para 1234-1235
word parte 1234-15
word partes 1234-156
word pela 1234-123-1
word pelas 1234-123-146
word pelo 1234-123
word pelos 1234-123-234
word pensamento 1234-234-134-2345
word pensamentos 1234-234-134-2345-234
word pequena 1234-12345-1345-1
word pequenas 1234-12345-1345-146
word pequeno 1234-12345-1345
word pequenos 1234-12345-1345-234
begmidword pl 1246
word ponta 1234-2345-1
word pontas 1234-2345-146
word ponto 1234-2345
word pontos 1234-2345-234
word por 1234
word porque 1234-12345
word portanto 1234-2345-2345
word portugal 1234-2345-1245-123
word portuguesa 1234-2345-1245-1
word portuguesas 1234-2345-1245-146
word portugueses 1234-2345-1245-234
word português 1234-2345-1245
word porém 1234-134
word posições 1234-12346-234
word posição 1234-12346
word possibilidade 1234-12-145
word possibilidades 1234-12-145-234
word possíveis 1234-1236-2346
word possível 1234-1236-123
word pouca 1234-14-1
word poucas 1234-14-146
word pouco 1234-14
word poucos 1234-14-234
begmidword pr 235
word própria 235-235-1
word próprias 235-235-146
word próprio 235-235-135
word próprios 235-235-13456
begword prerr 235-15-1235-1235
word primeira 235-1235-1
word primeiras 235-1235-146
word primeiro 235-1235
word primeiros 235-1235-234
word principais 235-14-2346
word principal 235-14-123
word princípio 235-14
word princípios 235-14-234
word produções 235-145-12346-234
word produção 235-145-12346
word produto 235-145
word produtos 235-145-234
word projecta 235-245-2345-1
word projectas 235-245-2345-146
word projecto 235-245-2345
word projectos 235-245-2345-234
word propriedade 235-235-145
word propriedades 235-235-145-234
begword prorr 235-135-1235-1235
word que 12345
begmidword qu 12345
word qualquer 12345-12345
word quando 12345-145
word quanta 12345-2345-1
word quantas 12345-2345-146
word quantidade 12345-2345-145
word quantidades 12345-2345-145-234
word quanto 12345-2345
word quantos 12345-2345-234
word quase 12345-234
word quer 12345-1235
word razões 1235-1356-234
word razão 1235-1356
begword re 3
word realidade 1235-123-145
word realidades 1235-123-145-234
word realizações 1235-123-1356-12346-234
word realização 1235-123-1356-12346
word reencontrem 3-26-25-356-15-134
word reentrem 3-26-356-15-134
word relações 3-123-12346-234
word relação 3-123-12346
begword rend 1235-26-145
begword renqu 1235-26-12345
begword rent 1235-26-2345
begword resc 1235-156-14
begword resf 1235-156-124
begword resfr 1235-156-16
begword resg 1235-156-1245
begword resm 1235-156-134
begword resp 1235-156-1234
word respeita 1235-1234-2345-1
word respeitas 1235-1234-2345-146
word respeito 1235-1234-2345
word respeitos 1235-1234-2345-234
begword respl 1235-156-1246
begword resqu 1235-156-12345
begword ress 1235-156-234
begword rest 1235-156-2345
begword restr 1235-156-356
begword resv 1235-156-1236
begword reum 1235-5-134
word rica 5-1235
endword rica 5-1235
word ricamente 5-1235-56-134
endword ricamente 5-1235-56-134
word ricas 5-1235-234
endword ricas 5-1235-234
word rico 4-1235
endword rico 4-1235
word ricos 4-1235-234
endword ricos 4-1235-234
word se 234
word seguinte 234-1245-2345
word seguintes 234-1245-2345-234
word segunda 234-1245-1
word segundas 234-1245-146
word segundo 234-1245
word segundos 234-1245-234
word sempre 234-1234
word senhor 234-1235
word senhora 234-1235-1
word senhoras 234-1235-146
word senhores 234-1235-234
word sentida 234-2345-145-1
word sentidas 234-2345-145-146
word sentido 234-2345-145-135
word sentidos 234-2345-145-13456
begword sext 234-1346-2345
word simples 234-1246
word sistema 234-2345-134
word sistemas 234-2345-134-234
word sobretudo 234-2345
word sua 234-1
word suas 234-146
word século 234-14-123
word séculos 234-14-123-234
word sujeita 234-245-2345-1
word sujeitas 234-245-2345-146
word sujeito 234-245-2345
word sujeitos 234-245-2345-234
word talvez 2345-1236
word também 2345-12
word tanta 2345-2345-1
word tantas 2345-2345-146
word tanto 2345-2345
word tantos 2345-2345-234
word te 2345
word tempo 2345-1234
word tempos 2345-1234-234
begword text 2345-1346-2345
endword tica 5-2345
endword ticamente 5-2345-56-134
endword ticas 5-2345-234
endword tico 4-2345
endword ticos 4-2345-234
word toda 2345-145-1
word todas 2345-145-146
word todavia 2345-145-1236
word todo 2345-145
word todos 2345-145-234
begmidword tr 356
word trabalha 356-125-1
word trabalhas 356-125-146
word trabalho 356-125
word trabalhos 356-125-234
word trem 356-15-134
word um 136
word uma 136-1
word umas 136-146
word uns 136-234
endword urica 136-5-1235
endword uricamente 136-5-1235-56-134
endword uricas 136-5-1235-234
endword urico 136-4-1235
endword uricos 136-4-1235-234
endword urrica 136-1235-5-1235
endword urricas 136-1235-5-1235-234
endword urrico 136-1235-4-1235
endword urricos 136-1235-4-1235-234
word valor 1236-123
word valores 1236-123-234
word vantagem 1236-2345-1245
word vantagens 1236-2345-1245-234
word verdade 1236-145
word verdadeira 1236-145-1235-1
word verdadeiras 1236-145-1235-146
word verdadeiro 1236-145-1235
word verdadeiros 1236-145-1235-234
word verdades 1236-145-234
word vez 1236-1356
word vezes 1236-1356-234
word vida 1236-1
word vidas 1236-146
word vista 1236-2345-1
word vistas 1236-2345-146
word visto 1236-2345
word vistos 1236-2345-234
word écloga 123456-14-123-135-1245-1
word éclogas 123456-14-123-135-1245-146
word égloga 123456-1245-123-135-1245-1
word églogas 123456-1245-123-135-1245-146
endword éria 5-123456
endword érias 5-123456-234
endword érica 123456-5-1235
endword éricas 123456-5-1235-234
endword érico 123456-4-1235
endword éricos 123456-4-1235-234
endword ério 4-123456
endword érios 4-123456-234
word ária 5-12356
endword ária 5-12356
word árias 5-12356-234
endword árias 5-12356-234
endword árica 12356-5-1235
endword áricas 12356-5-1235-234
endword árico 12356-4-1235
endword áricos 12356-4-1235-234
endword ário 4-12356
endword ários 4-12356-234
word última 23456-2345-134-1
word últimas 23456-2345-134-146
word último 23456-2345-134
word últimos 23456-2345-134-234
endword úrica 23456-5-1235
endword úricas 23456-5-1235-234
endword úrico 23456-4-1235
endword úricos 23456-4-1235-234
endword ância 5-16
endword âncias 5-16-234
endword âncio 4-16
endword ência 5-126
endword ências 5-126-234
endword êncio 4-126
endword êncios 4-126-234
endword írica 34-5-1235
endword íricas 34-5-1235-234
endword írico 34-4-1235
endword íricos 34-4-1235-234
midendword ão 3456
endword ãos 3456-234
endword ória 5-346
endword órias 5-346-234
endword órica 346-5-1235
endword óricas 346-5-1235-234
endword órico 346-4-1235
endword óricos 346-4-1235-234
endword ório 4-346
endword órios 4-346-234
